Tables/Contraction/zh_TW.ctb
always \uE18C 12356-17-23456
always \uE18D 12356-127-23456
always \uE18E 12356-147-23456
always \uE18F 12356-1457-23456
always \uF900 245-16-4
always \uF901 13-1356-5
always \uF902 12-2346-3
always \uF903 13-23456-4
always \uF904 1235-35-2
always \uF905 12-12456-5
always \uF906 13-1256-5
always \uF907 13-1246-3
always \uF908 13-1246-3
always \uF909 245-16-5
always \uF90A 13-1456-3
always \uF90B 14-345-4
always \uF90C 1345-2456-5
always \uF90D 14-1236-4
always \uF90E 14-2456-5
always \uF90F 14-25-2
always \uF910 14-25-2
always \uF911 14-25-2
always \uF912 14-25-4
always \uF913 14-25-2
always \uF914 14-2346-5
always \uF915 14-146-5
always \uF916 14-25-5
always \uF917 14-25-5
always \uF918 14-25-5
always \uF919 14-146-5
always \uF91A 14-25-5
always \uF91B 14-12456-5
always \uF91C 14-12456-4
always \uF91D 14-1236-2
always \uF91E 14-1236-5
always \uF91F 14-1236-2
always \uF920 14-12456-2
always \uF921 14-1236-2
always \uF922 14-1236-5
always \uF923 14-1236-2
always \uF924 14-1236-2
always \uF925 14-345-3
always \uF926 14-345-5
always \uF927 14-345-5
always \uF928 14-1346-2
always \uF929 14-1346-4
always \uF92A 14-1346-5
always \uF92B 14-1346-2
always \uF92C 14-1346-2
always \uF92D 14-2456-2
always \uF92E 14-1356-4
always \uF92F 14-146-2
always \uF930 14-34-4
always \uF931 14-34-4
always \uF932 14-34-2
always \uF933 14-34-2
always \uF934 14-146-4
always \uF935 14-34-2
always \uF936 14-34-4
always \uF937 14-34-5
always \uF938 14-34-5
always \uF939 14-34-4
always \uF93A 14-34-5
always \uF93B 14-34-5
always \uF93C 14-34-5
always \uF93D 14-1256-5
always \uF93E 14-34-5
always \uF93F 14-34-5
always \uF940 14-34-5
always \uF941 14-123456-5
always \uF942 14-12346-4
always \uF943 1345-12346-5
always \uF944 14-12346-2
always \uF945 14-12346-2
always \uF946 14-146-2
always \uF947 14-356-4
always \uF948 14-34-5
always \uF949 14-356-2
always \uF94A 14-356-4
always \uF94B 14-1256-4
always \uF94C 14-12356-2
always \uF94D 14-356-5
always \uF94E 14-12356-5
always \uF94F 14-356-5
always \uF950 14-1256-4
always \uF951 14-12356-5
always \uF952 14-2346-5
always \uF953 14-356-5
always \uF954 14-1456-4
always \uF955 14-13456-2
always \uF956 14-1356-2
always \uF957 14-13456-2
always \uF958 14-13456-2
always \uF959 14-13456-2
always \uF95A 145-34-2
always \uF95B 1345-345-2
always \uF95C 14-2346-5
always \uF95D 1345-25-5
always \uF95E 145-1236-3
always \uF95F 1345-13456-2
always \uF960 1345-34-5
always \uF961 14-1256-5
always \uF962 16-5
always \uF963 135-356-4
always \uF964 1234-1236-2
always \uF965 135-2345-5
always \uF966 12345-34-5
always \uF967 135-34-5
always \uF968 134-16-5
always \uF969 24-34-5
always \uF96A 15-25-4
always \uF96B 245-1236-3
always \uF96C 15-2346-5
always \uF96D 24-1356-4
always \uF96E 346-5
always \uF96F 24-25-3
always \uF970 24-345-3
always \uF971 12-136-2
always \uF972 24-136-4
always \uF973 24-156-2
always \uF974 1245-25-5
always \uF975 14-236-5
always \uF976 14-236-5
always \uF977 14-46-5
always \uF978 14-46-4
always \uF979 14-46-2
always \uF97A 14-46-2
always \uF97B 14-46-2
always \uF97C 14-46-2
always \uF97D 14-46-5
always \uF97E 14-46-5
always \uF97F 14-16-5
always \uF980 14-1256-4
always \uF981 1345-1256-4
always \uF982 14-34-2
always \uF983 14-1256-4
always \uF984 14-1256-5
always \uF985 14-16-5
always \uF986 14-1256-2
always \uF987 14-16-2
always \uF988 14-16-5
always \uF989 14-16-2
always \uF98A 14-16-5
always \uF98B 14-16-5
always \uF98C 14-16-5
always \uF98D 14-16-5
always \uF98E 1345-2345-2
always \uF98F 14-2345-2
always \uF990 14-2345-5
always \uF991 1345-2345-4
always \uF992 14-2345-2
always \uF993 14-2345-5
always \uF994 14-2345-4
always \uF995 1345-2345-2
always \uF996 14-2345-5
always \uF997 14-2345-2
always \uF998 1345-2345-4
always \uF999 14-2345-2
always \uF99A 14-2345-2
always \uF99B 14-2345-5
always \uF99C 14-346-5
always \uF99D 14-346-5
always \uF99E 2345-5
always \uF99F 14-346-5
always \uF9A0 14-346-5
always \uF9A1 24-25-3
always \uF9A2 14-2345-2
always \uF9A3 1345-2345-5
always \uF9A4 1345-2345-4
always \uF9A5 14-2345-5
always \uF9A6 14-2345-2
always \uF9A7 14-346-5
always \uF9A8 14-13456-5
always \uF9A9 14-13456-2
always \uF9AA 1345-13456-2
always \uF9AB 14-13456-4
always \uF9AC 14-2345-2
always \uF9AD 14-13456-2
always \uF9AE 13456-2
always \uF9AF 14-13456-2
always \uF9B0 14-13456-2
always \uF9B1 14-13456-2
always \uF9B2 14-13456-2
always \uF9B3 14-13456-2
always \uF9B4 14-13456-4
always \uF9B5 14-16-5
always \uF9B6 14-16-4
always \uF9B7 14-16-4
always \uF9B8 14-16-5
always \uF9B9 2346-5
always \uF9BA 14-2346-1
always \uF9BB 14-246-2
always \uF9BC 14-246-2
always \uF9BD 1345-246-5
always \uF9BE 14-246-5
always \uF9BF 14-2346-5
always \uF9C0 14-246-4
always \uF9C1 14-246-2
always \uF9C2 14-246-4
always \uF9C3 14-246-2
always \uF9C4 14-12346-2
always \uF9C5 256-3
always \uF9C6 1245-12456-4
always \uF9C7 14-234-2
always \uF9C8 12-12356-4
always \uF9C9 14-234-4
always \uF9CA 14-234-2
always \uF9CB 14-234-3
always \uF9CC 14-234-2
always \uF9CD 14-234-2
always \uF9CE 14-234-2
always \uF9CF 1345-234-4
always \uF9D0 14-356-5
always \uF9D1 14-234-5
always \uF9D2 14-34-5
always \uF9D3 14-34-5
always \uF9D4 14-123456-2
always \uF9D5 14-123456-2
always \uF9D6 14-123456-2
always \uF9D7 14-123456-2
always \uF9D8 14-1256-5
always \uF9D9 14-16-5
always \uF9DA 14-16-5
always \uF9DB 14-1256-5
always \uF9DC 14-12346-2
always \uF9DD 14-16-5
always \uF9DE 14-16-5
always \uF9DF 14-1256-4
always \uF9E0 16-5
always \uF9E1 14-16-4
always \uF9E2 14-16-2
always \uF9E3 1345-16-2
always \uF9E4 14-16-4
always \uF9E5 14-16-5
always \uF9E6 14-16-2
always \uF9E7 14-16-4
always \uF9E8 14-16-4
always \uF9E9 14-16-4
always \uF9EA 14-16-2
always \uF9EB 1345-16-5
always \uF9EC 1345-16-5
always \uF9ED 14-1456-5
always \uF9EE 14-1456-2
always \uF9EF 14-1456-2
always \uF9F0 14-1456-5
always \uF9F1 14-1456-2
always \uF9F2 14-1456-2
always \uF9F3 14-1456-2
always \uF9F4 14-1456-2
always \uF9F5 14-1456-2
always \uF9F6 14-1456-2
always \uF9F7 14-16-5
always \uF9F8 14-16-5
always \uF9F9 14-16-5
always \uF9FA 1-456-5
always \uF9FB 1-156-5
always \uF9FC 24-156-2
always \uF9FD 24-156-2
always \uF9FE 12-345-2
always \uF9FF 245-156-5
always \uFA00 245-346-3
always \uFA01 145-34-5
always \uFA02 124-25-5
always \uFA03 124-1346-2
always \uFA04 1-2456-2
always \uFA05 145-12346-5
always \uFA06 135-146-5
always \uFA07 12345-34-2
always \uFA08 15-13456-2
always \uFA09 13-46-5
always \uFA0A 13-2345-5
always \uFA0B 123-25-5
always \uFA0C 34-5
always \uFA0D 1235-25-5
always \uFA0E 24-456-3
always \uFA0F 15-1256-5
always \uFA10 1-12346-4
always \uFA11 245-16-2
always \uFA12 245-13456-2
always \uFA13 12345-34-2
always \uFA14 13-1256-4
always \uFA15 15-16-3
always \uFA16 1-34-3
always \uFA17 16-5
always \uFA18 14-16-4
always \uFA19 24-136-2
always \uFA1A 15-46-2
always \uFA1B 12345-34-2
always \uFA1C 13-13456-5
always \uFA1D 13-13456-3
always \uFA1E 1256-4
always \uFA1F 2456-1
always \uFA20 245-234-3
always \uFA21 24-1356-3
always \uFA22 1-34-3
always \uFA23 145-25-3
always \uFA24 13-16-2
always \uFA25 16-5
always \uFA26 145-12356-3
always \uFA27 15-246-5
always \uFA28 15-1456-5
always \uFA29 145-146-4
always \uFA2A 12345-1236-5
always \uFA2B 15-156-5
always \uFA2C 13-12456-4
always \uFA2D 1235-2346-5
always \uFA30 34-4
always \uFA31 15-1356-3
always \uFA32 134-2345-4
always \uFA33 134-2345-4
always \uFA34 245-1456-2
always \uFA35 135-356-3
always \uFA36 1235-2346-3
always \uFA37 124-1236-5
always \uFA38 245-16-5
always \uFA3A 134-126-5
always \uFA3B 245-1356-2
always \uFA3C 245-146-4
always \uFA3D 1235-1246-4
always \uFA3E 123-2456-4
always \uFA3F 125-1356-3
always \uFA40 12-1356-2
always \uFA41 134-1456-4
always \uFA42 13-16-5
always \uFA43 24-34-4
always \uFA44 134-356-2
always \uFA45 1235-2456-4
always \uFA46 1-34-4
always \uFA47 1235-1236-5
always \uFA48 1-34-4
always \uFA4A 1-25-2
always \uFA4B 135-356-3
always \uFA4C 24-2346-5
always \uFA4D 1-156-4
always \uFA4E 245-16-2
always \uFA4F 234-5
always \uFA50 125-34-4
always \uFA51 1-34-5
always \uFA52 1235-25-5
always \uFA53 1-136-3
always \uFA54 13-34-4
always \uFA55 124-34-3
always \uFA56 13-346-2
always \uFA57 14-2345-5
always \uFA58 13-1456-5
always \uFA59 12345-1236-2
always \uFA5A 24-34-4
always \uFA5B 1-2346-4
always \uFA5C 12-12356-5
always \uFA5D 245-146-4
always \uFA5E 245-146-4
always \uFA5F 1-2346-1
always \uFA60 1235-2346-5
always \uFA61 24-156-5
always \uFA62 346-5
always \uFA63 13-1456-4
always \uFA64 135-1456-3
always \uFA65 125-1356-5
always \uFA66 1-156-3
always \uFA67 16-5
always \uFA68 1345-1236-2
always \uFA69 15-46-4
always \uFA6A 1234-1456-2
always \uFA6F 1-34-5
always \uFA70 135-13456-5
always \uFA71 123-456-5
always \uFA72 245-45-2
always \uFA73 15-13456-2
always \uFA74 12-12346-3
always \uFA75 13-16-5
always \uFA76 235-4
always \uFA77 24-146-2
always \uFA78 1235-2346-3
always \uFA79 124-146-2
always \uFA7A 1235-1246-5
always \uFA7B 35-5
always \uFA7C 1-12346-4
always \uFA7D 12345-136-2
always \uFA7E 2345-4
always \uFA7F 135-136-5
always \uFA80 135-16-5
always \uFA81 245-156-2
always \uFA82 146-2
always \uFA83 16-5
always \uFA84 245-2456-4
always \uFA85 246-2
always \uFA86 456-4
always \uFA87 24-136-5
always \uFA88 1256-5
always \uFA89 125-1356-3
always \uFA8A 146-5
always \uFA8B 12-1356-2
always \uFA8C 145-2456-5
always \uFA8D 1256-2
always \uFA8E 15-12356-3
always \uFA8F 135-13456-5
always \uFA90 146-2
always \uFA91 245-13456-2
always \uFA92 14-1346-4
always \uFA93 456-5
always \uFA94 1-1346-5
always \uFA95 145-2456-4
always \uFA96 24-345-3
always \uFA97 14-234-2
always \uFA98 1456-2
always \uFA99 125-156-3
always \uFA9A 1235-1236-5
always \uFA9B 13-1456-5
always \uFA9C 1-34-4
always \uFA9D 245-246-2
always \uFA9E 13-236-2
always \uFA9F 12345-1236-5
always \uFAA0 1-34-3
always \uFAA1 124-2345-5
always \uFAA2 245-156-2
always \uFAA3 13-35-5
always \uFAA4 13-12456-3
always \uFAA5 123456-3
always \uFAA6 16-5
always \uFAA7 24-1356-5
always \uFAA8 1-156-2
always \uFAA9 13-45-5
always \uFAAA 1-2346-1
always \uFAAB 1-136-3
always \uFAAC 124-246-5
always \uFAAD 13-346-2
always \uFAAE 14-356-5
always \uFAAF 124-146-3
always \uFAB0 14-2345-5
always \uFAB1 124-13456-2
always \uFAB2 1-2346-4
always \uFAB3 1235-456-3
always \uFAB4 1235-35-2
always \uFAB5 1456-3
always \uFAB6 245-46-4
always \uFAB7 12345-34-5
always \uFAB8 24-156-5
always \uFAB9 145-246-5
always \uFABA 1-34-3
always \uFABB 245-13456-4
always \uFABC 346-5
always \uFABD 1345-25-5
always \uFABE 1256-5
always \uFABF 13-1456-4
always \uFAC0 135-2345-5
always \uFAC1 125-1356-5
always \uFAC2 24-34-3
always \uFAC3 12-156-2
always \uFAC4 15-12356-3
always \uFAC5 15-13456-2
always \uFAC6 1-34-4
always \uFAC7 1345-1236-2
always \uFAC8 13-13456-5
always \uFAC9 135-356-5
always \uFACA 15-46-4
always \uFACB 145-34-5
always \uFACC 1234-1456-2
always \uFACD 1-136-4
always \uFACE 13-1246-3
always \uFAD2 1235-2346-2
always \uFAD3 15-16-2
always \uFAD4 13-23456-2
always \uFAD5 245-25-5
always \uFAD7 13-346-2
always \uFAD8 13-2346-2
always \uFAD9 1234-1346-2
always \uFE30 25-25
always \uFE31 1256-0
always \uFE33 456
always \uFE34 45
always \uFE35 246-0
always \uFE36 135-0
always \uFE37 246-0
always \uFE38 12456-0
always \uFE39 2467-0
always \uFE3A 124567-0
always \uFE3B 2467-0
always \uFE3C 124567-0
always \uFE3D 126-126
always \uFE3E 345-345
always \uFE3F 126
always \uFE40 345
always \uFE41 56-36
always \uFE42 36-23
always \uFE43 236-236
always \uFE44 356-356
always \uFE4F 45
always \uFE50 23-0
always \uFE51 6-0
always \uFE52 36-0
always \uFE54 56-0
always \uFE55 156-0
always \uFE56 135-0
always \uFE57 2346-0
always \uFE59 12356
always \uFE5A 23456
always \uFE5B 246-0
always \uFE5C 12456-0
always \uFE5D 12346-0
always \uFE5E 13456-0
always \uFE5F 3456
always \uFE60 456-12346
always \uFE61 16
always \uFE62 346
always \uFE63 36
always \uFE64 126
always \uFE65 345
always \uFE66 123456
always \uFE68 12467-127
always \uFE69 1246
always \uFE6A 146
always \uFE6B 47
always \uFF01 123-0
always \uFF02 5-0
always \uFF03 3456-0
always \uFF04 1246-0
always \uFF05 146-0
always \uFF06 12346-0
always \uFF07 3-0
